Arkansas, session 2025, HB1887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-32-101 is amended to read as follows:
9-32-101. Collaboration of state agencies to form and implement
statewide child abduction response teams.
(a)(1) The following agencies shall collaborate in a multiagency
effort to rescue abducted or endangered children, implement one (1) or more
statewide child abduction response teams, and allocate the respective
resources of each agency to cases involving missing or endangered children:
(A) Office of the Attorney General Attorney General's
office;
(B) Division of Arkansas State Police;
(C) Criminal Justice Institute;
(D) Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(E) Arkansas Sheriffs' Association;
(F) Division of Emergency Management;
(G) Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police;
(H) Division of Community Correction; and
(I) Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator.
(2) Each agency listed under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
*LJH142*
03/20/2025 4:15:50 PM LJH142

HB1887
shall:
(A) Execute a memorandum of understanding concerning the
guidelines for the implementation of one (1) or more statewide child
abduction response teams; and
(B) Respectively respectively coordinate the available
resources of the agency to implement one (1) or more statewide child
abduction response teams and adhere to the executed memorandum of
understanding.
(b) The Division of Arkansas State Police shall:
(1) Assemble one (1) or more statewide child abduction response
teams; and
(2) Ensure that the agencies listed under subsection (a) of this
section work in partnership to:
(A) Respond to child abduction incidents; and
(B) Provide preventative measures for child abduction.
(c) The Criminal Justice Institute shall coordinate the certification
and recertification of each statewide child abduction response team.



















03/20/2025 4:15:50 PM LJH142